Georgia, session 2025_26, SB17.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as "Ricky and Alyssa's Law."
S. B. 17
- 1 -

LC 49 2242S (SCS)
SECTION 2.
Article 11 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
public school property and facilities, is amended by adding a new part to read as follows:
"Part 4
20-2-590.
(a) Not later than July 1, 2026, each public and private school shall implement a mobile
panic alert system capable of:
(1) Connecting disparate emergency services technologies to ensure real-time
coordination between multiple local and state law enforcement and first responder
agencies. Such system shall be known as the 'Alyssa's Alert' and shall integrate with the
technology used in each local public safety answering point, including, but not limited
to, Next Generation 9-1-1, as such term is defined in Code Section 38-3-181, to transmit
911 calls and mobile activations; and
(2) Integrating with the school mapping data required in Code Section 38-3-154.
(b) In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section, each local school
system may implement additional strategies or systems to ensure real-time coordination
between multiple first responder agencies in the event of a school security emergency.
(c) No local school system shall be required to procure or implement new or additional
capabilities if, as of July 1, 2026, such local school system has a functioning mobile panic
alert system in place with capabilities that meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this
Code section."
S. B. 17
- 2 -

LC 49 2242S (SCS)
SECTION 3.
Article 10 of Chapter 3 of Title 38 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
state-wide first responder building mapping information system, is amended by adding a new
paragraph to Code Section 38-3-151, relating to definitions, to read as follows:
"(4) 'School mapping data' means building information, floor plans, and aerial imagery
of any public or private school."
SECTION 4.
Said article is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"38-3-154.
(a) Not later than July 1, 2026, each public and private school shall procure school
mapping data which shall:
(1) Be in formats that conform to and integrate with software platforms utilized in local
public safety answering points and by local, state, and federal public safety agencies that
respond to emergencies at schools and that do not require such agencies to purchase
additional software or provide payment in order to view or access such data;
(2) Be in formats capable of being printed, shared electronically, and, if requested,
digitally integrated into interactive mobile platforms;
(3) Be verified for accuracy by July 1 each year by the entity producing such school
mapping data by means of an in-person inspection of each school;
(4) Identify and label access points of each building interior, including, but not limited
to, rooms, doors, stairwells, and hallways, each of which shall include any identifiers or
names utilized by staff and students;
(5) Identify and label locations of critical utilities, key boxes, automated external
defibrillators, and trauma kits or other emergency response aids; and
(6) Identify and label areas at or near each school, including parking areas, athletic fields,
surrounding roads, outbuildings, and neighboring properties.
S. B. 17
- 3 -

LC 49 2242S (SCS)
(b) Any future updates to school mapping data provided for in this Code section shall
conform to and integrate with software platforms utilized in local public safety answering
points and by local, state, and federal public safety agencies that provide emergency
services to each school.
(c) The agency shall be authorized to develop rules and regulations for the requirements
for school mapping data, including, but not limited to, standards for the use of school
mapping data, encryption of such data, and transmission of such data over secure methods
to law enforcement officers, firefighters, and other authorized emergency first responders.
(d) Information provided to the agency under this Code section shall be exempt from
public disclosure to the extent provided in Code Section 50-18-72.
(e)(1) Local boards of education, local school systems, public and private schools, and
local governments and agencies shall be immune from civil liability for any damages
arising out of the creation and use of the school mapping data.
(2) Employees of local boards of education, local school systems, and local governments
and agencies shall be immune from civil liability for any damages arising out of the
creation and use of the school mapping data unless it is shown that such employee acted
with gross negligence or bad faith."
SECTION 5.
This Act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 6.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 17
- 4 -